Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
PART 9
CHARITABLE GAMING

44-30-901. Events sponsored by charitable organizations.

Any person licensed as a retailer, or as both a retailer and operator, may choose to allow a charitable organization to sponsor limited gaming at that retailer's licensed premises, if the following conditions are met:

The organization is a charitable organization, that for purposes of this section means any organization, not for pecuniary profit, that is operated for the relief of poverty, distress, or other condition of public concern within this state and that has been so engaged for five years prior to making application to sponsor limited gaming under this article 30;

The licensed operator or retailer and the charitable organization agree in writing upon all the terms and conditions of the sponsorship, and a copy of the written agreement is filed with the commission at least fourteen days prior to the day of the sponsored event;

All sponsored events shall take place on licensed retail premises, and all requirements of this article 30 shall apply to the events, unless specifically modified by this part 9; and

Criminal violations of this article 30 discovered during an authorized investigation or discovered by the commission shall be referred to the appropriate district attorney.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 219, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-901 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-902. Terms of sponsorship.

All limited gaming events sponsored by charitable organizations pursuant to this part 9 must, in addition to all the other requirements of this article 30, meet the following conditions:

The agreement between the licensed operator or retailer and the charitable organization shall provide for the payment by the charitable organization to the retailer or operator of a flat fee or no fee; in return, the charitable organization shall receive one hundred percent of the adjusted gross proceeds, less the amount of taxes due on those proceeds as determined by the commission from gaming for each day of the sponsored event, or during all the hours of a sponsored event if less than a full day. The licensed operator or retailer shall report and pay taxes on the full amount of the adjusted gross proceeds from gaming sponsored by any charitable organization.

A one-day sponsored event must, for purposes of this part 9, begin at 8 a.m. and end at 8 a.m. the following day. For purposes of this section, no event is considered as less than a one-day event; except that a retailer may devote less than one full day to a charitable event.

No retailer shall permit a single charitable organization to sponsor more than three days of limited gaming at that retailer's licensed premises during any calendar year; and no retailer shall permit more than thirty total days of sponsored events on its premises during any calendar year;

No charitable organization shall sponsor more than three days of limited gaming during any calendar year;

The charitable organization shall file notice of its intent to sponsor limited gaming at least fourteen days in advance with the commission, upon forms provided by the commission.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 219, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-902 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-903. Notice of sponsorship.

No person licensed as a retailer, operator, key employee, or support person, and no member, agent, employee, officer, or director of a charitable organization, shall represent to any person that a limited gaming activity is being sponsored by that or another charitable organization unless the sponsoring charitable organization has filed a notice of intent with the commission pursuant to section 44-30-902 (1)(e).

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 220, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-903 as it existed prior to 2018.